Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.274

Minimum retirement allowance—Annual adjustment.

Effective January 1, 2003, the minimum retirement allowance under RCW 43.43.260 and 43.43.270(2) in effect on January 1, 2002, shall be increased by three percent. Each January 1st thereafter, the minimum retirement allowance of the preceding year shall be increased by three percent.

[ 2001 c 329 s 8; 1999 c 74 s 3; 1997 c 72 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 329: See note following RCW 43.43.120.